Arkansas, session 2025, HB1999.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 80, is amended to add an
additional section to read as follows:
6-80-111. Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program information.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Education shall send to each
student who submits a Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) and
who has a negative or zero (0) student aid index for the year written and
electronic information regarding:
(1) His or her potential eligibility for assistance under the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program;
(2) The application process to obtain assistance under the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program; and
(3) How to contact the Department of Human Services regarding
*CRH351*
04/07/2025 3:45:33 PM CRH351

HB1999
the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.
(b) The Secretary of the Department of Education shall consult with
the Secretary of the Department of Human Services to design the written and
electronic communication required under subsection (a) of this section.
































04/07/2025 3:45:33 PM CRH351